es: Accesorios para computadora incluidos: Auriculares; Teclado; Bolso para computadora portátil; Soporte para monitor; Ratón; Alfombrilla de ratón; Concentrador USB; Otros
da: Computertilbehør medfølger: Headset; Keyboard; Laptoptaske; Monitorstativ; Mus; Musemåtte; USB-hub; Andet
zh-CN: 包括计算机配件: 耳机; 键盘; 笔记本电脑包; 显示器支架; 老鼠; 鼠标垫; USB 集线器; 其他
hu: A tartalmazott számítógépes tartozékok: Fejhallgató; Billentyűzet; Laptoptáska; Monitorállvány; Egér; Egérpad; USB elosztó; Egyéb
pt-BR: Acessórios de computador incluídos: Fone de ouvido; Teclado; Bolsa de laptop; Suporte para monitor; Camundongo; Mouse Pads; Hub USB; Outro
de: Inbegriffenes Computerzubehör: Headset; Keyboard; Laptoptasche; Monitorständer; Maus; Mauspad; USB-Hub; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Počítačové príslušenstvo v cene: Náhlavná súprava; Klávesy; Taška na notebook; Stojan na monitor; Myš; Podložka pod myš; USB hub; Iné
pt-PT: Acessórios de computador incluídos: Auscultadores; Teclado; Mala de portátil; Suporte para monitor; Rato; Tapete de rato; Hub USB; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ υπολογιστή: Κάσκα ακουστικών; Αρμόνιο; Τσάντα φορητού υπολογιστή; Βάση οθόνης; Ποντίκι; Βάση για ποντίκι; Ομφαλός USB; Άλλο
ru: Компьютерные аксессуары в комплекте: Гарнитура; Клавиатура; Сумка для ноутбука; Подставка для монитора; Мышь; Коврик для мыши; USB-концентратор; Другое
ro-RO: Accesorii computer incluse: Căști; Tastatură; Geantă pentru laptop; Suport pentru monitor; Mouse; Suport pentru mouse; Hub USB; Altele
tr: Bilgisayar aksesuarları dahil: Kulaklık; Klavye; Dizüstü bilgisayar çantası; Monitör standı; Fare; Fare altlığı; USB hub'ı; Diğer
it: Accessori per computer inclusi: Cuffia; Tastiera; Borsa per portatile; Supporto per monitor; Mouse; Tappetino per mouse; Hub USB; Altro
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za računalnik: Slušalke; Tipkovnica; Torba za prenosni računalnik; Stojalo za monitor; Miška; Podloga za miško; USB zvezdišče; Drugo
pl: Akcesoria komputerowe w zestawie: Słuchawki nagłowne; Klawiatura; Torba na laptopa; Stojak na monitor; Mysz; Podkładka pod myszkę; Hub USB; Inne
nl: Inclusief computeraccessoires: Headset; Keyboard; Laptoptas; Monitorstandaard; Muis; Muismat; USB-hub; Andere
th: รวมอุปกรณ์คอมพิวเตอร์: ชุดหูฟัง; คีย์บอร์ด; กระเป๋าใส่แล็ปท็อป; ขาตั้งจอภาพ; หนูตัวเล็ก; แผ่นรองเมาส์; ฮับ USB; อื่นๆ
ko: 컴퓨터 부대용품 포함: 헤드셋; 키보드; 노트북 가방; 모니터 스탠드; 마우스; 마우스 패드; USB 허브; 기타
fi: Mukana tietokonetarvikkeita: Kuulokkeet; Kosketinsoitin; Kannettavan tietokoneen laukku; Näytön teline; Hiiri; Hiirimatto; USB-keskitin; Muu
cs: Obsažené příslušenství k počítači: Headset; Klávesnice; Brašna na notebook; Stojan na monitor; Myš; Podložka pod myš; USB hub; Jiné
zh-TW: 包括電腦配件: 一副耳機; 鍵盤樂器; 筆記型電腦包; 顯示器支架; 鼠; 滑鼠墊; USB 集線器; 其他
nb: Inkludert datamaskintilbehør: Hodesett; Tastatur; Laptopveske; Monitorstativ; Mus; Musematte; USB-hub; Annet
en: Computer accessories included: Headset; Keyboard; Laptop bag; Monitor stand; Mouse; Mouse pad; USB hub; Other
bg-BG: Включени компютърни аксесоари: Слушалки; Клавиатура; Чанта за лаптоп; Стойка за монитор; Мишка; Подложка за мишка; USB хъб; Други
vi: Phụ kiện máy tính đi kèm: Tai nghe có micrô; Đàn phím; Túi đựng máy tính xách tay; Giá đỡ màn hình; Chuột nhắt; Tấm lót chuột; Bộ chia USB; Khác
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys kompiuterio priedai: Ausinės; Klaviatūra; Nešiojamojo kompiuterio krepšys; Monitoriaus stovas; Pelė; Pelės kilimėlis; USB šakotuvas; Kita
sv: Datortillbehör ingår: Headset; Keyboard; Datorväska; Monitorstativ; Mus; Musmatta; USB-hubb; Övrigt
fr: Accessoires informatiques inclus: Casque; Clavier; Ordinateur portable; Support pour moniteur; Souris; Tapis de souris; Concentrateur USB; Autre
ja: コンピューター関連商品 (詳細): ヘッドセット; キーボード; ノートパソコン用のバッグ; モニタースタンド; ネズミ; マウスパッド; USBハブ; その他
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za računalo: Slušalice s mikrofonom; Tipkovnica; Torba za prijenosno računalo; Stalak za monitor; Miš; Podloga za miš; USB čvorište; Ostalo